Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB490.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 566(3) and 586(3) of Title 2 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 566. Confidential communications in presence of interpreter.An interpreter appointed under this subchapter may not be compelled to testify, in any judicial proceeding or administrative proceeding, to statements made by the person with limited English proficiency and interpreted by the interpreter when the person with limited English proficiency is engaged in a confidential communication as provided by any statute or general rule, including, but not limited to:* * *(3) 42 Pa.C.S. § 5942 (relating to [confidential] 12345678910111213141516171819 communications to news reporters).* * *§ 586. Confidential communications in presence of interpreter.An interpreter appointed under this subchapter may not be compelled to testify, in any judicial proceeding or administrative proceeding, to statements made by the person who is deaf and interpreted by the interpreter when the person who is deaf is engaged in a confidential communication as provided by any statute or general rule, including, but not limited to:* * *(3) 42 Pa.C.S. § 5942 (relating to [confidential] communications to news reporters).* * *Section 2. Sections 4415(3) and 4436(3) of Title 42 are amended to read:§ 4415. Confidential communications in presence of interpreter.An interpreter appointed under this subchapter shall not be compelled to testify in any judicial proceeding or administrative proceeding to any statements made by the person with limited English proficiency and interpreted by the interpreter when the person with limited English proficiency is engaged in a confidential communication as provided by any statute or general rule, including, but not limited to:* * *(3) Section 5942 (relating to [confidential] communications to news reporters).* * *§ 4436. Confidential communications in presence of interpreter.An interpreter appointed under this subchapter shall not be compelled to testify in any judicial proceeding or 20250HB0490PN0479 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administrative proceeding to any statements made by the person who is deaf and interpreted by the interpreter when the person who is deaf is engaged in a confidential communication as provided by any statute or general rule, including, but not limited to:* * *(3) Section 5942 (relating to [confidential] communications to news reporters).* * *Section 3. Section 5942 heading and (a) of Title 42 is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 5942. [Confidential communications] Communications to news reporters.(a) [General rule] Confidential communications to news reporters.--No person engaged on, connected with, or employed by any newspaper of general circulation or any press association or any radio or television station, or any magazine of general circulation, for the purpose of gathering, procuring, compiling, editing or publishing news, shall be required to disclose the source of any information procured or obtained by such person, in any legal proceeding, trial or investigation before any government unit.* * *(c) Communications and news gathering information not involving source identity.--A person engaged on, connected with or employed by a newspaper of general circulation, press association, radio or television station or magazine of general circulation, for the purposes of gathering, procuring, compiling, editing or publishing news, shall have a qualified 20250HB0490PN0479 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 privilege to refuse to disclose their nonconfidential sources and materials.(d) Court ordered disclosure.--The privilege under subsection (c) may only be overcome by order of a court in accordance with the following:(1) A party to a matter before a court must demonstrate the following:(i) The party has made an effort to obtain the information from other sources.(ii) The information is only accessible through persons described in subsection (c).(iii) The information is critical to the case.(2) A court shall order disclosure only of the portion of the information sought that meets all the criteria under paragraph (1) with clear and specific findings made after a hearing.(e) Limitation.--The following limitations shall apply to this section:(1) Any information obtained in violation of this section shall be inadmissible in an action or proceeding or hearing before an agency.(2) No fine or imprisonment may be imposed against a person for any refusal to disclose information privileged by the provisions of this section.(3) The privilege contained within this subsection shall apply to a supervisory or employer third person or organization having authority over the individual described in subsection (c).Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0490PN0479 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829